Massachusetts, session 194th, H147.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 4 of chapter 94G subsection (a1/2)(xxix), as so appearing, is hereby
amended by inserting in subsection (a1/2)(xxix)(6) after the word “marijuana” the following
words:-
provided that the commission shall not prohibit advertising, marketing and branding of
sales, discounts, and customer loyalty programs within a Marijuana Establishment, through a
Delivery service, on an internet website maintained by a Marijuana Establishment, or through an
opt-in email marketing campaign; SECTION 2. The commission shall promulgate or amend
regulations as necessary to be consistent with Section 1 not later than 365 days from the effective
date of this act.
of 1